Missouri, session 2026, SB1465.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 67.599, to read as
follows:
67.599. 1. The governing body of a county with more
than nine thousand nine hundred but fewer than eleven
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
one thousand but fewer than one thousand five hundred
inhabitants may adopt an order or ordinance imposing a sales
tax on all retail sales made within the county that are
subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The rate of such
tax may be imposed in increments of one-eighth of one
percent but shall not exceed one percent.
2. Such tax shall not become effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the voters of the
county, on any date available for elections for the county,
a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to
impose such tax. Such tax shall be in addition to all other
taxes imposed by law. Such tax shall be stated separately
from all other charges and taxes. The proceeds of such tax
shall be used by the county solely for the purpose of

SB 1465 2
providing funding for county facilities including, but not
limited to, the operation and maintenance of county
facilities.
3. (1) The ballot of submission for such tax shall
contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language: "Shall ______ (insert the county name) impose a
sales tax at a rate of _______ (insert percentage) percent
for the purpose of providing funding for county facilities?".
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by
the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, such tax shall become effective on the first day
of the second calendar quarter immediately following
notification to the state department of revenue. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
voters voting thereon are opposed to the question, such tax
shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of
the county and such question is approved by a majority of
the qualified voters of the county voting on the question.
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions
of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed
under this section.
5. (1) All moneys collected under this section by the
director of the department of revenue on behalf of such
county, less one percent for cost of collection, which shall
be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after
payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section
32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is
hereby created and shall be known as the "County Facilities
Sales Tax Fund". Moneys in the fund shall not be deemed to
be state moneys and shall not be commingled with any moneys
of the state. The director may make refunds from the

SB 1465 3
amounts in the fund and credited to the county for erroneous
payments and overpayments made and may redeem dishonored
checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such county.
(2) Any moneys in the special fund that are not needed
for current expenditures shall be invested in the same
manner as other moneys are invested. Any interest and
moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the
fund.
(3) Not later than the tenth day of each month the
director of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in
the trust fund during the preceding month to the district
which levied the tax. Moneys in the fund shall be used
solely for the designated purposes.
6. The governing body of a county that has adopted
such tax may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the
voters on any date available for elections for the county.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal,
the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first
of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If
a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal,
such tax shall remain effective until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
7. If such tax is repealed or terminated by any means,
all moneys remaining in the special trust fund shall
continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. The
county shall notify the director of the state department of
revenue of the repeal or termination at least ninety days
before the effective date of the repeal or termination. The

SB 1465 4
director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after
receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
overpayments of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and
drafts deposited to the credit of such account. After one
year has elapsed after the effective date of the repeal or
termination, the director shall remit the balance in the
account to the county and close the account of that county.
The director shall notify such county of each instance of
any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due
the county.
✓